Arkansas, session 2025, SB443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-11-301 is amended to read as follows:
17-11-301. Certificate of registration required.
(a)(1) Every person, firm, or private corporation engaged in the
business of abstracting in one (1) county only, shall be or have in its
employ a registered abstracter.
(2) Every person, firm, or private corporation engaged in the
business of abstracting in more than one (1) county in this state shall have
at least one (1) registered abstracter for each county in which it maintains
an abstract office.
(b) No person shall execute an abstract certificate or otherwise
attest to the accuracy of abstracts unless the person is a registered
*LGL132*
04-03-2025 11:15:06 LGL132

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 SB443
abstracter as defined in this chapter.
(c)(1) Each person engaged in the business of abstracting who is a
registered abstracter may fulfill the requirements of subsection (a) of this
section in one (1) county only.
(2) No registered abstracter may fulfill the requirements of
subsection (a) of this section for more than one (1) county or more than one
(1) company at any one (1) time.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-11-302(d), concerning an application for
to become a registered abstracter, is amended to read as follows:
(d) Thereupon the board shall notify the applicant of the time and
place of the next scheduled examination, and notice of the examination shall
be given to the applicant by mail or email.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 17-11-305(d), concerning a temporary
certificate of registration as an abstracter, is amended to read as follows:
(d) The board shall notify the applicant by mail or email of the time
and place of the examination.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 17-11-322(c), concerning renewal notice for
a certificate of registration as an abstracter, is amended to read as
follows:
(c)(1)(A) No more than sixty (60) days nor less than thirty (30) days
before the expiration date of the certificate issued, the board shall cause a
notice of expiration and application for renewal to be mailed or
electronically mailed to each of the holders of the certificates.
(B) The notice and application shall be in a form prepared
by the board.
(2) Upon determination by the board of the applicant's
compliance with this chapter, a renewal certificate of authority shall be
issued to the applicant.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 17-11-322(d)(1), concerning failure to
renew a certificate of registration as an abstracter, is amended to read as
follows:
(d)(1)(A) If a holder of a certificate of authority fails to apply for
04-03-2025 11:15:06 LGL132

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 SB443
renewal of his or her authority and to pay the fee provided therefor, the
board shall cause to be mailed or emailed to the holder a notice that his or
her certificate has expired and is no longer valid authority for the person
to engage in the business of abstracting.
(B) The notice shall be mailed or emailed not more than
thirty (30) days following the certificate expiration date.
(C) The holder shall be granted an additional period of
sixty (60) days from the date of mailing the notice within which to file his
or her application for renewal.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 17-11-342 is repealed.
17-11-342. Seal.
Any licensee under this chapter shall provide a seal, which shall have
stamped on the license the name of the licensee, and shall deposit with the
State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors an impression of
the seal and the names of all persons authorized to sign certificates to
abstracts on behalf of the licensee.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 17-11-343 is repealed.
17-11-343. Abstract as evidence.
An abstract or photostat or verbatim copy of any public record, where
certified by and impressed with the official seal of any licensed abstracter,
shall be admissible in evidence, if otherwise admissible, on behalf of any
party litigant in any court in the State of Arkansas and shall be prima facie
evidence of the facts recited therein.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 17-11-404 is repealed.
17-11-404. Investigations – Independent or private investigator.
(a) A member of the State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home
Inspectors shall not:
(1) Act as an investigator on a matter before the board; or
(2) Perform any investigative task or work required by the
board.
(b)(1)(A) The board shall contract an independent investigator or
private investigator to perform any investigative task or work as needed or
as required by law.
04-03-2025 11:15:06 LGL132

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 SB443
(B) An independent investigator or private investigator
contracted under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section shall have expertise
or background in the subject matter in which he or she is being contracted to
investigate.
(2) An appropriation made available for professional fees in the
board's Operations appropriation act shall be made available to the board for
the purpose of contracting under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.
(c)(1) The board shall file a report annually on or before December 1
with the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the
House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs for the Senate
Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs' and the House Committee
on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs' review.
(2) The report shall include:
(A) The number of complaints that have been filed;
(B) A list of who has been investigated and the purported
violation; and
(C) A summary of the findings of each investigation.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 17-14-103(17), concerning definitions
pertaining to appraisers, is amended to read as follows:
(17)(A) “Real estate appraisal” means an unbiased estimate of
the nature, quality, value, or utility of an interest in, or aspect of,
identified real estate and related personalty.;
(B)(i) A real estate appraisal may be classified by
subject matter into either a valuation or an evaluation.
(ii) Valuation is the process of estimating the
market value, investment value, insurable value, or other properly defined
value of an identified interest or interests in a specific parcel or parcels
of real estate as of a given date.
(iii) Evaluation or analysis is the study of the
nature, quality, or utility of a parcel of real estate, or interests in or
aspects of real property, in which a value estimate is not necessarily
required, i.e., a study of real estate or real property other than estimating
value;

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 17-14-201(a)(3), concerning the
04-03-2025 11:15:06 LGL132

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 SB443
composition of the State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home
Inspectors, is amended to read as follows;
(3) One (1) senior and consumer representative;

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 17-14-201(b)(2), concerning the composition
of the State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors, is
repealed.
(2) At least four (4) real estate appraiser members appointed to
the board shall be members in good standing of:
(A) A state or regional chapter of a nationally recognized
real estate appraisal organization that requires an individual to have
qualified appraisal experience, education, and testing in order to become a
designated member and to adhere to standards of professional practice in
order to retain such a designation; or
(B) The Association of Consulting Foresters of America,
Inc., Arkansas Chapter.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 17-14-203(6)(E)(i), the powers and duties
of the State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors, is
amended to read as follows:
(E)(i) Every applicant for registering, licensing, and
certifying shall be accompanied by an application fee and a criminal
background check fee that the State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and
Home Inspectors may establish by rule.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 17-14-205(b), concerning disciplinary
hearings conducted by the State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home
Inspectors, is repealed.
(b) Disciplinary hearings conducted by the board for the purpose of
determining whether to levy civil penalties under the Arkansas Appraiser
Licensing and Certification Act, § 17-14-101 et seq., § 17-14-201 et seq.,
and § 17-14-301 et seq., and for the purpose of determining whether to revoke
or suspend any registration, license, or certificate issued under the
Arkansas Appraiser Licensing and Certification Act, § 17-14-101 et seq., §
17-14-201 et seq., and § 17-14-301 et seq., shall not be deemed open public
meetings but shall be executive sessions conducted as provided for in the
04-03-2025 11:15:06 LGL132

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 SB443
Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 17-14-206(a)(3), concerning disciplinary
action of the State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors, is
amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(3) Conviction of or pleading guilty or nolo contendere to any
offense listed under § 17-3-102 or § 17-14-203(12)(C) unless the person
requests and the board approves a waiver under § 17-3-102(b).

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 17-14-305 is amended to read as follows:
17-14-305. Compliance with uniform standards and code of ethics –
Seals – Licensing and certification documents.
(a)(1) Each state-registered appraiser, each state-licensed appraiser,
each registered apprentice appraiser, and each state-certified appraiser
shall comply with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice
and code of ethics adopted by the State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and
Home Inspectors and shall authenticate all written appraisal reports with a
seal that shall indicate the registration, license, or certification number
of the appraiser.
(2)(b) The seal and number shall also be used in all statements
of qualifications, contracts, or other instruments used by the registration,
license, or certificate holder when reference is made to his or her status as
a state-registered appraiser, state-licensed appraiser, registered apprentice
appraiser, or state-certified appraiser.
(b) Registration, license, and certificate documents, licenses,
certificates, seals, and pocket cards shall remain the property of the state,
and, upon any suspension, revocation, or other termination of a registration,
license, or certification under the Arkansas Appraiser Licensing and
Certification Act, § 17-14-101 et seq., § 17-14-201 et seq., and § 17-14-
301 et seq., the individual holding the related documents shall immediately
return the documents to the board.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 17-14-409(a)(1), concerning the registry
of applicants for appraisers, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The Executive Director of the State Board of Appraisers,
Abstracters, and Home Inspectors shall keep a register of all applicants for
04-03-2025 11:15:06 LGL132

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 SB443
registration.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 17-52-303(8), concerning definitions
pertaining to home inspectors, is amended to read as follows:
(8) “Residential unit” means any dwelling from one (1) to four (4)
units in design intended principally for residential purposes by one (1) or
more persons a structure consisting of at least one (1) but no more than four
(4) units designed for occupancy by a single family that is occupied or
unoccupied.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 17-52-306 is amended to read as follows:
17-52-306. Powers and duties of board.
The State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors may:
(1) Perform the duties and functions appropriate and necessary to
carry out the provisions of this subchapter;
(2) Review, approve, or reject registration applications and issue
registration certificates to applicants;
(3) Establish a mandatory continuing education program designed to
upgrade the professional skills and knowledge of home inspectors practicing
in Arkansas;
(4)(A) Establish administrative procedures for disciplinary
proceedings conducted according to the provisions for this subchapter.
(B) The procedures shall include provisions for the suspension
and revocation of registration and enforcement of civil penalties;
(5) Establish procedures for processing and resolving complaints
against home inspectors conducting home inspections in Arkansas;
(6) Authorize disbursement of the funds collected into the Arkansas
Home Inspectors Registration Fund;
(7) Employ legal counsel to represent it in any proceedings when legal
counsel is required;
(8) Develop competency exams for home inspectors;
(9)(7) Establish a standard of practice and code of ethics for home
inspectors;
(10)(8) Enter into agreements with other states, territories,
districts, or possessions of the United States concerning registration or
licensing requirements acceptable between Arkansas and the other entities;
04-03-2025 11:15:06 LGL132

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 SB443
(11)(9) Maintain working files as it deems necessary;
(12) Contract for administrative support services and meet financial
obligations of those contracts using moneys from the fund;
(13)(A)(10)(A) Develop and implement a means for conducting internet
board meetings, which may be observed by the public in real time.
(B) Public participation in the meetings may be permitted in
accordance with rules developed by the board;
(14)(11) Establish and maintain a website devoted to home inspection
registration and related subjects; and
(15) [Repealed.]
(16)(12) Establish educational requirements for registration to begin
after July 1, 2004, including the standards and procedures for approval of
educational programs if the maximum number of hours required shall not exceed
ninety (90) classroom hours.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 17-52-307 is amended to read as follows:
17-52-307. Hearings – Review – Access to records.
(a) As part of an investigation or as a condition of renewal, the
State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors may require a
home inspector to submit in writing home inspection reports and other
documents to be reviewed by the board.
(b) Requests by the board for copies of home inspection reports shall
supersede any contract of client privacy or confidentiality whether written
or oral.
(c) Any documents submitted to the board as part of an investigation
shall:
(1) Be considered as confidential documents;
(2) Be used only for the purpose for which they are requested;
(3) Not be available for public viewing;
(4) Not become part of any official file; and
(5) Not be revealed to any nonboard members.
(d) When the action for which they were requested is completed by the
board, the documents shall be returned to the home inspector at his or her
own expense or destroyed if the home inspector requests that the documents be
destroyed.
(e)(c) In fulfilling its duties under this subchapter, the board shall
04-03-2025 11:15:06 LGL132

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 SB443
comply with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.,
and any person aggrieved by any rule or other actions of the board for which
an appeal is not provided for in the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §
25-15-201 et seq., may appeal to the Pulaski County Circuit Court.
(f) All work papers submitted to the board for action on complaints
and disciplinary procedures under this subchapter shall not be deemed public
records under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 17-52-310(e)(1), concerning continuing
education for home inspectors, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) Failure to complete continuing education requirements shall may
result in suspension of the home inspector’s registration.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 17-52-311 is amended to read as follows:
17-52-311. Custodian of records.
(a)(1) The Executive Director of the State Board of Appraisers,
Abstracters, and Home Inspectors shall be the custodian of permanent,
official, home inspector registration files and shall maintain permanent
records of all home inspector registration applications received since the
enactment of this subchapter.
(2) The executive director shall maintain the permanent records
of the State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors.
(b) The executive director shall receive and process applications for
initial registration and renewal of registration.

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 17-52-312 is amended to read as follows:
17-52-312. Fund.
(a) There is created in the State Treasury a fund to be known as the
“Arkansas Home Inspectors Registration Fund” “State Board of Appraisers,
Abstracters, and Home Inspectors Fund”.
(b) All funds, fees, charges, costs, and collections accruing to or
collected under the provisions of this subchapter shall be deposited into the
State Treasury to the credit of this fund.
(c) The funds shall be used for the purposes as specified in this
subchapter.
(d)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (d)(2) of this section,
04-03-2025 11:15:06 LGL132

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 SB443
effective with the 2003 registration and under the provisions of this
subchapter, all funds, fees, charges, costs, and collections accruing to or
collected by the Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing shall be
deposited quarterly into the fund.
(2) [Repealed.]
(e) The State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors
will process disbursements of those funds as necessary in the administration
of this subchapter.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 17-52-313 is amended to read as follows:
17-52-313. Disposition of funds.
(a)(1) The Executive Director of the State Board of Appraisers,
Abstracters, and Home Inspectors shall receive, disburse, and account for all
income paid to or received by the State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and
Home Inspectors.
(2) The executive director shall institute a system of books and
financial records satisfactory to the Secretary of the Department of Finance
and Administration.
(3)(A) All fees collected on behalf of the board and all
receipts of every kind and nature shall be paid into the State Treasury and
shall be credited to the Arkansas Home Inspectors Registration Fund State
Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors Fund.
(B) The Arkansas Home Inspectors Registration Fund State
Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors Fund shall be for the
general uses of the board, and out of it shall be paid all salaries and all
other expenses necessarily incurred in carrying into effect the provisions of
this subchapter.
(C) Expenditures from the Arkansas Home Inspectors
Registration Fund State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors
Fund shall be substantiated by vouchers and itemized statements at the end of
each fiscal year or at any other time when demand is made by the Department
of Finance and Administration.
(4) The executive director shall deposit all funds of the board
that he or she receives with the State Treasury within forty-eight (48)
hours, excluding holidays and Sundays, after he or she receives the funds.
(b) All fines collected for the violation of any provisions of this
04-03-2025 11:15:06 LGL132

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 SB443
subchapter shall be paid over to the board to be used by it in the same
manner as funds received for the issuance of registration.
(c) The total amount of warrants issued by the board or Auditor of
State in payment of the expenses and compensation provided in this subchapter
shall not exceed the amount of the application, registration, and other fees
collected.
(d)(1) Any surplus funds at the end of the fiscal year may be retained
by the board for future expenditures.
(2) The board shall not be required to pay any surplus into the
General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 17-52-315(a)(1), concerning an application
for registration as a home inspector, is amended to read as follows:
(1) An application under oath upon a form to be prescribed by
the board;

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 17-52-316(d), concerning registration and
renewal fees set by the State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home
Inspectors concerning home inspectors, is amended to read as follows:
(d) Other fees authorized to be assessed by the board are:
(1) Delinquent renewal Late fees not to exceed the amount of the
renewal fee for one year; and
(2) Home inspector training or continuing education provider
fees as follows:
(A) Initial qualifying fees not to exceed two hundred
dollars ($200);
(B) Annual renewal fees not to exceed two hundred dollars
($200); and
(C) Additional course filing fees not to exceed twenty-
five dollars ($25.00);
(3) Duplicate registration fees not to exceed twenty-five
dollars ($25.00);
(4) Returned check fees not to exceed twenty-five dollars
($25.00); and
(5) Change-of-address fees not to exceed twenty-five dollars
($25.00).
04-03-2025 11:15:06 LGL132

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 SB443

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 17-52-317 is amended to read as follows:
17-52-317. Certificates of registration.
(a)(1) Certificates of registration shall be issued by the State Board
of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors to an applicant after
compliance with the registration or renewal requirements of this subchapter.
(2) Certificates shall be consecutively numbered.
(b) When registration is renewed, that person's registration number
shall be perpetuated.
(c) Certificates of registration of a home inspector shall be issued
for a period of at least one (1) year and shall expire at the end of a period
of up to three (3) years, as may be set by the board expire annually on
December 31.
(d) Notices of upcoming registration expiration and a reminder to
renew shall be mailed or emailed to registered home inspectors no more than
sixty (60) days and no less than forty-five (45) days before the expiration
date of the applicant's registration.

SECTION 27. Arkansas Code § 17-52-320 is amended to read as follows:
17-52-320. Limitations.
(a) Any cause of action to recover damages suffered by a consumer as a
result of any act or omission of a home inspector relating to a home
inspection report must be commenced within one (1) year from the date the
home inspection report is completed.
(b) Disciplinary action taken against a home inspector by the State
Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors shall not in and of
itself be the basis for civil or criminal action.

SECTION 28. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301(93), concerning the abstracter’s
examining licenses and fees, is repealed.
(93) Abstracter's examining licenses and fees, as enacted by
Acts 1969, No. 109, as amended, known as the “Abstracters' Licensing Law of
1969”, § 17-11-101 et seq.;

SECTION 29. Arkansas Code § 19-6-415 is repealed.
19-6-415. Arkansas Abstracters’ Board Fund.
04-03-2025 11:15:06 LGL132

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 SB443
The Arkansas Abstracters' Board Fund shall consist of those special
revenues as specified in § 19-6-301(93), there to be used for the
maintenance, operation, and improvement of the State Board of Appraisers,
Abstracters, and Home Inspectors.

SECTION 30. DO NOT CODIFY. Abolition of the Arkansas Abstracters’
Board Fund.
The Arkansas Abstracters’ Board Fund is abolished, and all funds are
transferred to the State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home
Inspectors Fund.

SECTION 31. DO NOT CODIFY. Abolition of the Arkansas Home Inspectors
Registration Fund.
The Arkansas Home Inspectors Registration Fund is abolished, and all
funds are transferred to the State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home
Inspectors Fund.

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the State Board of Appraisers,
Abstracters, and Home Inspectors preserves the public peace, health, and
safety by providing needed funds and services for Arkansas; that this act
provides for the abolition and transfer of the Arkansas Abstracters' Board
Fund and the Arkansas Home Inspectors Registration Fund to the State Board of
Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors Fund; and that this act should
become effective on July 1, 2025, to coincide with the appropriation bill of
the State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors and ensure
that the State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors
continues to provide its vital services as the transfer is implemented and
does not experience any issues with funding under the transfer. Therefore, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on July 1, 2025.

/s/J. Bryant


04-03-2025 11:15:06 LGL132